New York, session 2025-2026, A1195.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (i) of section 3216 of the insurance law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph 41 to read as follows: 3 (41) (A) Every policy which provides medical, major medical, or simi- 4 lar comprehensive-type coverage shall provide coverage for follow-up 5 screening or diagnostic services for lung cancer upon the recommendation 6 of a health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice 7 pursuant to title eight of the education law, and as recommended by 8 nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines for the detection of 9 lung cancer. 10 (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any policy that 11 provides coverage required by this paragraph shall not impose patient 12 cost sharing for follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung 13 cancer. 14 (C) For the purposes of this paragraph, "nationally recognized clin- 15 ical practice guidelines" means evidence-based, peer reviewed clinical 16 practice guidelines informed by a systematic review of evidence and an 17 assessment of the benefits, and risks of alternative care options 18 intended to optimize patient care developed by independent organizations 19 or medical professional societies utilizing a transparent methodology 20 and reporting structure and with a conflict of interest policy. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02876-02-5 A. 1195--A 2 1 (D) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prevent medical 2 management or utilization review of the services, including preauthori- 3 zation, to ensure that such services are consistent with nationally 4 recognized clinical practice guidelines for the detection of lung 5 cancer. 6 (E) If the policy is a high deductible health plan as defined in 7 section 223(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, such coverage 8 may be subject to the plan's annual deductible if application of this 9 requirement would result in ineligibility for a health savings account. 10 § 2. Subsection (l) of section 3221 of the insurance law is amended by 11 adding a new paragraph 23 to read as follows: 12 (23) (A) Every policy which provides medical, major medical, or simi- 13 lar comprehensive-type coverage shall provide coverage for follow-up 14 screening or diagnostic services for lung cancer upon the recommendation 15 of a health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice 16 pursuant to title eight of the education law, and as recommended by 17 nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines for the detection of 18 lung cancer. 19 (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any policy that 20 provides coverage required by this paragraph shall not impose patient 21 cost sharing for follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung 22 cancer. 23 (C) For the purposes of this paragraph, "nationally recognized clin- 24 ical practice guidelines" means evidence-based, peer reviewed clinical 25 practice guidelines informed by a systematic review of evidence and an 26 assessment of the benefits, and risks of alternative care options 27 intended to optimize patient care developed by independent organizations 28 or medical professional societies utilizing a transparent methodology 29 and reporting structure and with a conflict of interest policy. 30 (D) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prevent medical 31 management or utilization review of the services, including preauthori- 32 zation, to ensure that such services are consistent with nationally 33 recognized clinical practice guidelines for the detection of lung 34 cancer. 35 (E) If the policy is a high deductible health plan as defined in 36 section 223(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, such coverage 37 may be subject to the plan's annual deductible if application of this 38 requirement would result in ineligibility for a health savings account. 39 § 3. Section 4303 of the insurance law is amended by adding a new 40 subsection (ww) to read as follows: 41 (ww) (1) Every policy which provides medical, major medical, or simi- 42 lar comprehensive-type coverage shall provide coverage for follow-up 43 screening or diagnostic services for lung cancer upon the recommendation 44 of a health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice 45 pursuant to title eight of the education law, and as recommended by 46 nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines for the detection of 47 lung cancer. 48 (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any policy that 49 provides coverage required by this subsection shall not impose patient 50 cost sharing for follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung 51 cancer. 52 (3) For the purposes of this paragraph, "nationally recognized clin- 53 ical practice guidelines" means evidence-based, peer reviewed clinical 54 practice guidelines informed by a systematic review of evidence and an 55 assessment of the benefits, and risks of alternative care options 56 intended to optimize patient care developed by independent organizations A. 1195--A 3 1 or medical professional societies utilizing a transparent methodology 2 and reporting structure and with a conflict of interest policy. 3 (4) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prevent medical 4 management or utilization review of the services, including preauthori- 5 zation, to ensure that such services are consistent with nationally 6 recognized clinical practice guidelines for the detection of lung 7 cancer. 8 (5) If the policy is a high deductible health plan as defined in 9 section 223(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, such coverage 10 may be subject to the plan's annual deductible if application of this 11 requirement would result in ineligibility for a health savings account. 12 § 4. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027 and shall apply to all 13 policies and contracts issued, renewed, modified, altered or amended on 14 or after such date.